Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1269
Act, how cited.

Sections 72-1261 to 72-1269 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act.

Laws 1978, LB 258, § 9;

Laws 1985, LB 614, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 1146, § 4.